lez_pro.lexd
PATTERN Pronoun
((ProperPersonalPronouns | PersonalPronoun_You1) [<prn>:] ProAbs)[^[NonBack,Back]]
ProperPersonalPronounsErg [<prn>:] [<erg>:]
((ProperPersonalPronouns | PersonalPronoun_You1) [<prn>:] ProGen)[^[NonBack,Back]]
((ProperPersonalPronouns | PersonalPronoun_You2) [<prn>:] ProErgObl ProDat)[^[NonBack,Back]]
((ProperPersonalPronouns | PersonalPronoun_You2) [<prn>:] ProErgObl InflEssive (Elative | Directive)?)[^[NonBack,Back]]
FuncPersPron [<prn>:] (FuncAbs | (AdjErg (Case | (InflEssive (Elative | Directive)?))?)) 
ReflPron [<prn>:] [<abs>:]
ReflPronObl [<prn>:] ([<erg>:] | Case | (InflEssive (Elative | Directive)?))
QuestionPron [<prn>:] [<abs>:] QuestionPlural?
QuestionPronSg [<prn>:] [<abs>:]
QuestionPronObl ([<erg>:] | Case | (InflEssive (Elative | Directive)?))
NegativeNonInfl [<prn>:] [<abs>:]
NegativeObl(1) [<prn>:] ([<erg>:] | Case |  (InflEssive (Elative | Directive)?)) NegativeObl(2)
DetAbs [<prn>:] [<abs>:]
DetAbsPl [<prn>:] [<pl>:] [<abs>:]
Det [<prn>:]
Det [<prn>:] AdjErg (Case |  (InflEssive (Elative | Directive)?))?
Quantifier [<prn>:] [<abs>:]
Quantifier [<prn>:] AdjErg (Case |  (InflEssive (Elative | Directive)?))?

LEXICON ProperPersonalPronouns
з[Back] # я
в[Back] # ты
ч[Back] # мы

LEXICON PersonalPronoun_You1
к[NonBack] # вы

LEXICON PersonalPronoun_You2
кв[NonBack] # вы

LEXICON ProAbs
<abs>:ун[Back]
<abs>:уьн[NonBack]

LEXICON ProperPersonalPronounsErg
з:за # я
в:вуна # ты
ч:чна # мы
к:куьне # вы

LEXICON ProErgObl
<erg>:а[Back]
<erg>:е[NonBack]

LEXICON ProGen
<gen>:и[Back]
<gen>:уь[NonBack]

LEXICON ProDat
<dat>:з

LEXICON FuncPersPron
а # он, они

LEXICON FuncAbs
<sg><abs>:м
<pl><abs>:бур

LEXICON ReflPron
жув # сам (1, 2 лицо)
вич # сам (3 лицо ед.ч)
чеб # сами (3лицо мн.ч.)

LEXICON ReflPronObl
жув:жува
вич:вичи
чеб:чпи

LEXICON QuestionPron
вуж # кто
вуч # что

LEXICON QuestionPronSg
гьи # который
мус # когда
шумуд # как много
вучиз # почему

LEXICON QuestionPlural
<pl>:ар

LEXICON QuestionPronObl
вуж:ни
вуч:куь
гьи:хи

LEXICON NegativeNonInfl
касни # никто
затӀни # ничто
садни # ни один, никто

LEXICON NegativeObl(2)
сада ни

LEXICON Det
и # этот
гьа # тот
а # тот

LEXICON DetAbs
а:ам
и:им
гъа:гъам

LEXICON DetAbsPl
а:абур
и:ибур
гьа:гьабур

LEXICON Quantifier
вири # все
гьар # каждый
муькуь # другой из двух
